District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.51a

TANF Universal Service Delivery Model.

(a)

By no later than September 30, 2011, the Mayor shall have adopted and fully implemented the TANF Universal Service Delivery Model, as created by the Department of Human Services, which shall:

(1)

Address customer needs based on personal and family circumstances, to the extent feasible;

(2)

Require orientation and a detailed assessment and referral to an appropriate array of services and supports, which shall be provided through:

(A)

Contract job placement;

(B)

Education and training vendors, and

(C)

District agencies;

(3)

Emphasize education, training, and skills enhancement;

(4)

Assist customers in addressing and overcoming challenges that are barriers to employment;

(5)

Include financial disincentives to customers who without good cause remain unemployed;

(6)

Provide for participation with the TEP program;

(7)

Provide for an Individual Responsibility Plan for each customer; and

(8)

Include a system of sanctions for a customer who fails to participate or complete an Individual Responsibility Plan.

(b)

A nonexempt customer who fails to participate or complete an Individual Responsibility Plan shall be subject to a progressive, graduated sanction policy, as established by the Department of Human Services. Each level of sanctions shall reduce further the maximum grant a customer will be eligible to receive.

(c)

The Mayor shall submit a draft plan of the TANF Universal Service Delivery Model to the Council for its review by March 1, 2011.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 551a
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 522(e), 58 DCR 1008
Former § 4-205.51a has been recodified as § 4-205.51b.